District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.33

Limited liability.

No person, including any bond owner, shall have any claims against the District or any of its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents for monetary damages suffered as a result of the failure of the District to perform any covenant, undertaking, or obligation under this subchapter, the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents, or as a result of the incorrectness of any representation in or omission from the Financing Documents or the Closing Documents, unless the District or its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents have acted in a willful and fraudulent manner.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-254, § 2(b), 55 DCR 9275
This section is referenced in § 47-340.34.